Utah statutes.
59-14-706.   Revocation of certification -- Denial of certification or revocation of certification appeal procedures -- Removal of cigarette rolling machine from premises.

(1)  In addition to the penalties provided under this title, the commission shall revoke the certification of a cigarette rolling machine operator if the cigarette rolling machine operator violates this part.

(2)  The following are subject to review in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act:

(a)  the commission's denial of certification or denial of renewal of certification under Section 59-14-703; or

(b)  the commission's revocation of certification under this section.

(3)  If the commission revokes the certification of a cigarette rolling machine operator:

(a)  the commission shall send written notice of the revocation to the cigarette rolling machine operator; and

(b)  the cigarette rolling machine operator:

(i)  may not use the cigarette rolling machine or make or offer to make the cigarette rolling machine available for use; and

(ii)  no later than 10 days after the date the commission sends the written notice described in Subsection (3)(a), shall remove the cigarette rolling machine from the cigarette rolling machine operator's premises.



Enacted by Chapter 148, 2013 General Session

